Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-2626
Insurance consultant's license; denial; when.

The director may refuse to issue a consultant's license to an applicant if such applicant has failed to comply with any prerequisite for the issuance of such license, has made a material misstatement in the application for license, or has demonstrated untrustworthiness, financial irresponsibility, or incompetency.

Laws 1980, LB 481, § 21.